Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 1. Oil Pollution Control.

Administrative Code. —

For oil pollution prevention requirements, see 18 AAC 75, art. 1.

Sec. 46.04.010.
Reimbursement for cleanup expenses.

The department shall promptly seek reimbursement under AS

46.03.760(d)

, AS

46.08.070

, or from an applicable federal fund, for the expenses it incurs in cleaning up or containing a discharge of oil. If the department obtains reimbursement for a portion of its expenses from a federal fund, the remainder of the expenses incurred may be recovered under AS

46.03.760(d)

or AS

46.08.070

. Money received by the department under this section shall be deposited in the general fund and credited to

the oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation account established under AS

46.08.025(b)

; the amount required to be deposited under this paragraph shall represent the proportion of the expenses recovered that were originally paid for from the oil and hazardous substance release account established under AS

46.08.010(a)(2)

; or

the oil and hazardous substance release prevention mitigation account established under AS

46.08.020(b)

; the amount required to be deposited under this paragraph is the amount of money recovered that exceeds the amount payable to the response mitigation account under (1) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, “AS

46.03.760

(d)” was substituted for “AS

46.03.760(e)

in two places to reflect the 1995 reorganization of AS

46.03.760

.

Sec. 46.04.020.
Removal of oil discharges.

A person causing or permitting the discharge of oil shall immediately contain and clean up the discharge. The department may waive this requirement

if it determines, in consultation with the United States Coast Guard or the United States Environmental Protection Agency, as appropriate, that containment or cleanup is technically not feasible; or

if the cleanup or containment activities would result in greater environmental damage than the discharge itself.

The containment and cleanup of discharged oil shall be carried out in a manner approved by the department. Wastes generated as a result of containment or cleanup activities shall be disposed of in a manner approved by the department. The requirement of this subsection for approval of containment and cleanup activities does not apply to the United States Coast Guard or United States Environmental Protection Agency acting under the authority of § 311(c) or (d) of the Clean Water Act.

If the department determines that containment or cleanup activities are not adequate, it may direct the person engaged in the activities to cease and may undertake the activities itself through contract or its own resources, or both. The department may not direct the cessation of containment or cleanup activities undertaken by the United States Coast Guard or United States Environmental Protection Agency under § 311 of the Clean Water Act. However, the department may undertake, direct, or authorize supplemental cleanup or containment efforts.

The department shall provide for the immediate containment or cleanup of an oil discharge of unexplained origin unless

the department determines, in consultation with the United States Coast Guard or the United States Environmental Protection Agency that containment or cleanup of the oil discharge is technically not feasible; or

the containment or cleanup activities would result in greater environmental damage than the discharge itself.

The department shall enter into negotiations for memoranda of understanding or cooperative agreements with the United States Coast Guard, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and other persons in order to

facilitate coordinated and effective oil discharge prevention and response in the state, including agreements relating to development and enforcement of vessel traffic control and monitoring systems for tank vessels and oil barges operating in or near the waters of the state;

provide for cooperative review of oil discharge prevention and contingency plans submitted to the department under AS

46.04.030

;

provide for cooperative inspections of oil terminal facilities by the department and the United States Coast Guard or United States Environmental Protection Agency; and

provide for cooperative oil discharge notification procedures.

In fulfilling its responsibilities under (e) of this section, the department shall consult with the governing bodies of municipalities and villages.

In addition to existing obligations under state and federal law, and the provisions of the state and federal Trans Alaska Pipeline System right-of-way agreements, the common operating agent for the holder and lessees of the right-of-way agreement for the trans Alaska pipeline shall (1) immediately contain and clean up a discharge or threatened discharge of oil transported by or due to the operation of the Trans Alaska Pipeline System or due to related activities, including activities related to a vessel en route to, berthed at, or transiting from the Trans Alaska Pipeline System marine terminal or traveling on waters within Prince William Sound; and (2) provide services required in a response action under contract terms as provided under AS

46.04.030(q)

. The obligations imposed under this subsection do not affect the response action duties of another person or the liability of another person for a discharge or threatened discharge. Upon the request of the person required to respond to a discharge or threatened discharge under this subsection, the obligation imposed by this subsection may be transferred to another person required by law to respond to the discharge or threatened discharge if the transfer is approved by the federal and state on-scene coordinators. In this subsection, “Prince William Sound” has the meaning given in AS

46.04.030(q)

.

A charge, contract term, or financial responsibility requirement imposed by the holders and lessees of the right-of-way agreement for the Trans Alaska Pipeline System, the holders and lessees’ common operating agent, or the agent or representative of either the holders and lessees, or their common operating agent, on or for a vessel traveling from a marine terminal and related to containing and cleaning up a discharge or threatened discharge of oil or the obligations imposed under (g) of this section

must be fair, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory; and

with respect to a financial responsibility requirement in excess of $10,000,000, must

not exceed the potential cost of containment and cleanup as provided in the applicable contingency plan under AS

46.04.030

that the agent may reasonably be expected to incur from a discharge or threatened discharge of oil from that vessel before the transfer of cleanup and containment management and control to the responsible party; in establishing the financial responsibility requirement, the common operating agent shall assume that transfer of management and control will occur at the earliest practicable time following the discharge or threat of discharge; and

vary among each vessel in proportion to the volume of oil carried by each vessel per voyage from a marine terminal; for purposes of this subparagraph, the volume of oil carried by the vessel must be reduced by the percentage of spill reduction credits granted that vessel under regulations adopted by the department.

The superior court and, with respect to intrastate voyages, the Regulatory Commission of Alaska under AS

42.05.361

—

42.05.431

, have concurrent jurisdiction to review and enjoin a charge, contract term, or financial responsibility requirement described under (h) of this section at the request of a vessel owner, operator, or charterer. Except as provided in this subsection, nothing in this section affects the jurisdiction of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am § 8 ch 191 SLA 1990; am § 12 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 10 ch 83 SLA 1992; am § 23 ch 25 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in subsection (g), “AS

46.04.030

(q)” was substituted for “AS

46.04.030(r)

” in two places to reflect the 1995 reorganization of AS

46.04.030

.

Cross references. —

For civil penalties for discharges of oil, see AS

46.03.758

; for civil actions for pollution, see AS

46.03.760

; for provisions imposing strict liability for discharge of hazardous substances, see AS

46.03.822

.

Administrative Code. —

For discharge reporting, cleanup, and disposal of oil and other hazardous substances, see 18 AAC 75, art. 3.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For corrective action for leaking underground storage tanks, see 18 AAC 78, art. 2.

For cleanup levels, see 18 AAC 78, art. 6.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 311 of the Clean Water Act, referred to in subsections (b) and (c), may be found in 33 U.S.C. § 1321.

Sec. 46.04.025.
Confidential information.

The department may maintain the confidentiality of a manufacturer’s proprietary technical information relating to chemical and biological agents used to control or mitigate the effects of an oil discharge. The department may refuse to release the information unless the manufacturer authorizes its release or unless a court orders its release.
The department may provide the information to the Department of Fish and Game and other state and federal agencies if the department or other agency requesting the information agrees to maintain its confidentiality.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980)

Sec. 46.04.030.
Oil discharge prevention and contingency plans.

A person may not cause or permit the operation of an oil terminal facility in the state unless an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan for the facility has been approved by the department and the person is in compliance with the plan.

A person may not cause or permit the operation of a pipeline or an exploration or production facility in the state unless an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan for the pipeline or facility has been approved by the department and the person is in compliance with the plan.

Except as provided in (n) of this section, a person may not operate a tank vessel or an oil barge within the waters of the state, or cause or permit the transfer of oil to or from a tank vessel or an oil barge, unless an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan for the tank vessel or oil barge has been approved by the department and the person is in compliance with the plan.

Upon approval of a contingency plan, the department shall issue to the plan holder a certificate stating that the contingency plan has been approved by the department. The certificate must include the name of the facility, pipeline, tank vessel, or oil barge for which it is issued, the effective date of the contingency plan, and the date by which the contingency plan must be submitted for renewal. A contingency plan must be submitted for renewal every five years.

The department may attach reasonable terms and conditions to its approval or modification of a contingency plan that the department determines are necessary to ensure that the applicant for a contingency plan has access to sufficient resources to protect environmentally sensitive areas and to contain, clean up, and mitigate potential oil discharges from the facility or vessel as provided in (k) of this section, and to ensure that the applicant complies with the contingency plan. If a contingency plan submitted to the department for approval relies on the services of an oil spill primary response action contractor, the department may not approve the contingency plan unless the primary response action contractor is registered and approved under AS

46.04.035

. The contingency plan must provide for the use by the applicant of the best technology that was available at the time the contingency plan was submitted or renewed. The department shall identify the prevention and response technologies that are subject to a best available technology determination. The department may find that any technology meeting the response planning standards in (k) of this section or a prevention performance standard established under AS

46.04.070

is the best available technology. The department may prepare findings and maintain a list of those technologies that are considered the best available. The department may require an applicant or holder of an approved contingency plan to take steps necessary to demonstrate the applicant’s or holder’s ability to carry out the contingency plan, including

periodic training;

response team exercises; and

verifying access to inventories of equipment, supplies, and personnel identified as available in the approved contingency plan.

Upon request of a plan holder or on the department’s own initiative, the department, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may modify its approval of a contingency plan if the department determines that a change has occurred in the operation of a facility or vessel necessitating an amended or supplemented plan, or the operator’s discharge experience demonstrates a necessity for modification. The department, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may revoke its approval of a contingency plan if the department determines that

approval was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation;

the operator does not have access to the quality or quantity of resources identified in the plan;

a term or condition of approval or modification has been violated; or

the person is not in compliance with the contingency plan and the deficiency materially affects the plan holder’s response capability.

Failure of a holder of an approved or modified contingency plan to comply with the plan, or to have access to the quality or quantity of resources identified in the plan or to respond with those resources within the shortest possible time in the event of a spill is a violation of this chapter for purposes of AS

46.03.760(a)

,

46.03.765

,

46.03.790

, and any other applicable law. If the holder of an approved or modified contingency plan fails to respond to and conduct cleanup operations of an unpermitted discharge of crude oil with the quality and quantity of resources identified in the plan and in a manner required under the plan, the holder is strictly liable, jointly and severally, for the civil penalty assessed under AS

46.03.758

,

46.03.759

, or

46.03.760

against any other person for that discharge.

The department is the only state agency that has the power to approve, modify, or revoke a contingency plan for the purposes of this section. The department shall exercise its power under this section in a timely manner. Except as provided in (i) of this section, it is not a defense to an action brought for a violation of (a) — (c) of this section that the person charged believed that a current contingency plan had been approved by the department.

It is a defense to an action brought for a violation of (a) — (c) of this section that the person charged relied on a certificate of approval issued by the department under (d) of this section unless the person knew or had reason to know at the time of the alleged violation that approval of the plan had been revoked or that the holder of the plan was not capable of carrying out the plan.

Before the department approves or modifies a contingency plan under this section, the department shall provide a copy of the contingency plan to the Department of Fish and Game and to the Department of Natural Resources for their review. The department shall by regulation establish the procedures and time limits applicable to agency review of contingency plans.

Except as provided in (m) and (o) of this section, the holder of an approved contingency plan required under this section shall maintain, or have available under contract, in its region of operation or in another region of operation approved by the department, singly or in conjunction with other operators, sufficient oil discharge containment, storage, transfer, and cleanup equipment, personnel, and resources to meet the following response planning standards:

for a discharge from an oil terminal facility, the plan holder shall plan to be able to contain or control, and clean up a discharge equal to the capacity of the largest oil storage tank at the facility within 72 hours, except that if the department determines that the facility is located in an area of high risk because of natural or man-made conditions outside of the facility, it may increase the volume requirement under this paragraph so that the contingency plan must be designed for a response that is greater in amount than the capacity of the largest oil storage tank at the facility;

for a discharge from an exploration or production facility or a pipeline, the plan holder shall plan to be able to contain or control, and clean up the realistic maximum oil discharge within 72 hours;

for a discharge of crude oil from a tank vessel or oil barge, the plan holder shall plan to be able to contain or control, and clean up a realistic maximum oil discharge as provided in (A), (B), and (C) of this paragraph:

for tank vessels and oil barges having a cargo volume of less than 500,000 barrels, the plan holder shall maintain at a minimum in the region of operation, equipment, personnel, and other resources sufficient to contain or control, and clean up a 50,000 barrel discharge within 72 hours;

for tank vessels and oil barges having a cargo volume of 500,000 barrels or more, the plan holder shall maintain at a minimum in its region of operation, equipment, personnel, and other resources sufficient to contain or control, and clean up a 300,000 barrel discharge within 72 hours;

in addition to the minimum equipment, personnel, and other resources required to be maintained within the region of operation by (A) or (B) of this paragraph, a plan holder shall maintain, either within or outside of the plan holder’s region of operation, additional equipment, personnel, and other resources sufficient to contain or control, and clean up a realistic maximum discharge within the shortest possible time; the plan holder must demonstrate that the equipment, personnel, and other resources maintained outside the plan holder’s region of operation are accessible to the plan holder and will be deployed and operating at the discharge site within 72 hours;

for a discharge from a tank vessel or oil barge carrying noncrude oil in bulk as cargo, the plan holder shall plan to be able to contain or control 15 percent of the maximum capacity of the vessel or barge or the realistic maximum oil discharge, whichever is greater, within 48 hours and clean up the discharge within the shortest possible time consistent with minimizing damage to the environment;

for a discharge subject to the provisions of (1) — (3) of this subsection that enters a receiving environment other than open water, the time requirement for clean up of the portion of the discharge that enters the receiving environment may, in the department’s discretion, be within the shortest possible time consistent with minimizing damage to the environment.

The provisions of (k) of this section do not constitute cleanup standards that must be met by the holder of a contingency plan. Notwithstanding (k) of this section, failure to remove a discharge within the time periods set out in (k) of this section does not constitute failure to comply with a contingency plan for purposes of (g) of this section or for the purpose of imposing administrative, civil, or criminal penalties under any other law.

When considering whether to approve or modify a contingency plan, the department may consider evidence that oil discharge prevention measures such as double hulls or double bottoms on vessels or barges, secondary containment systems, hydrostatic testing, enhanced vessel traffic systems, or enhanced crew or staffing levels have been implemented, and, in its discretion, may make exceptions to the requirements of (k) of this section to reflect the reduced risk of oil discharges from the facility, pipeline, vessel, or barge for which the plan is submitted or being modified.

A tank vessel or oil barge that is conducting, or is available only for conducting, oil discharge response operations is exempt from the requirements of (c) of this section if the tank vessel or oil barge has received prior approval of the department. The department may approve exemptions under this subsection upon application and presentation of information required by the department.

A holder of an approved contingency plan does not violate the terms of the contingency plan by furnishing to another plan holder, with the approval of the department, equipment, materials, or personnel to assist the other plan holder in a response to an oil discharge. The plan holder shall replace or return the transferred equipment, materials, and personnel as soon as feasible. The department shall by regulation determine the maximum amount of equipment, materials, or personnel and the maximum amount of time for which it will approve a transfer.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 16 SLA 1993.]

Except as provided in (n) of this section and in order to receive approval from the department for an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan submitted under this section, the owner, operator, or charterer of a vessel that intends to carry oil that has been transported by the Trans Alaska Pipeline System shall obtain by contract the services required in a response action from the common operating agent for the holders and lessees of the right-of-way agreement for the Trans Alaska Pipeline System. The contract must contain the following provisions: (1) the common operating agent, as a primary response action contractor shall, unless services required in a response action are transferred as provided in (3) of this subsection, provide services required in a response action for a discharge or a threatened discharge of oil to the owner, operator, or charterer of the vessel while the vessel is berthed at, en route to, or transiting from the Trans Alaska Pipeline System marine terminal or traveling on waters within Prince William Sound; (2) that its coverage for any particular vessel may not be terminated by the common operating agent while that vessel is within Prince William Sound; this provision may not be interpreted to limit the department’s authority to revoke approval under this section for an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan submitted by the owner, operator, or charterer of a vessel; and (3) the owner, operator, or charterer of the vessel shall accept a transfer of the services required in a response action to a discharge or threatened discharge, after receiving not less than 72 hours of advance notice and after the transfer has been approved by the federal and state on-scene coordinators. In addition to the requirements of this subsection, the department may require individual vessels to submit additional contingency plans to cover specific vessel response, prevention equipment, and procedures. Nothing in this subsection is intended to preclude the federal or state government from assuming management and control of an oil spill response to a discharge or threatened discharge from a vessel under appropriate circumstances. In this subsection, “Prince William Sound” means all marine waters within the boundary line established at Cape Puget, southeasterly to Cape Cleare, along Montague Island to Zaikof Point, easterly to Cape Hinchinbrook, along Hinchinbrook Island to Point Bintinck, and easterly to Point Whitshed.

In this section,

“contingency plan” means an oil discharge prevention and contingency plan required under this section;

“in compliance with the plan” means, with respect to a contingency plan, to

establish and carry out procedures identified in the plan as being the responsibility of the holder of the plan;

have access to and have on hand the quantity and quality of equipment, personnel, and other resources identified as being accessible or on hand in the plan;

fulfill the assurances espoused in the plan in the manner described in the plan;

comply with terms and conditions attached to the plan by the department under the authority of (e) of this section; and

successfully demonstrate the ability to carry out the plan when required by the department under (e) of this section;

“realistic maximum oil discharge” means the maximum and most damaging oil discharge that the department estimates could occur during the lifetime of the tank vessel, oil barge, facility, or pipeline based on the size, location, and capacity of the tank vessel, oil barge, facility, or pipeline; on the department’s knowledge and experience with the tank vessel, oil barge, facility, or pipeline or with similar tank vessels, oil barges, facilities, or pipelines; and on the department’s analysis of possible mishaps to the tank vessel or oil barge or at the facility or pipeline or to similar tank vessels or oil barges or at similar facilities or pipelines;

“region of operation,” with respect to the holder of a contingency plan, means the area where the operations of the holder that require a contingency plan are located, the boundaries of which correspond to the regional boundaries established by the commissioner for regional master planning purposes under AS

46.04.210

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 140 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 41 SLA 1989; am §§ 9, 10 ch 191 SLA 1990; am § 59 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 11, 12 ch 83 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1993; am § 8 ch 140 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 45 SLA 2003; am § 52 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, former subsection (r) was relettered as (q) and former (q) was relettered as (r).
In 2008, in (q) of this section, “Montague” was substituted for “Montigue” to correct a manifest error in ch. 83, SLA 1992.

Cross references. —

For detention of vessel as security for payment of damages, see AS

46.03.770

.

Administrative Code. —

For informal and fee review procedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 5.

For administrative appeal proceedures, see 18 AAC 15, art. 6.

For oil pollution prevention requirements, see 18 AAC 75, art. 1.

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For oil spill primary response action contractors and nontank vessel cleanup contractors, incident management teams, and response planning facilitators, see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

Sec. 46.04.035.
Registration of oil spill response action contractors.

A person may apply to the department for registration as an oil spill primary response action contractor. The department shall adopt regulations governing the registration and approval of oil spill primary response action contractors. Regulations adopted by the department under this section must include

minimum training standards for personnel;

verification requirements that ensure the existence of resources, including personnel, equipment, services, and an adequate deployment plan necessary to a response action or as required by a contingency plan in which the contractor has agreed in writing to be listed and is listed;

minimum professional response action standards and practices; and

minimum planning standards for oil spill primary response action contractors listed in an oil spill contingency plan approved under AS

46.04.030

.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may substitute a primary response action contractor approval program, and a subsequent process to approve primary response action contractors who agree to be listed in a contingency plan approved under AS

46.04.030

, for regulations required under (a)(1) — (3) of this section if the approval program and subsequent process are developed by the United States Coast Guard.

The department shall establish fees applicable to registration under this section in an amount necessary to cover the costs of the registration program. The fees shall be collected by the department.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and registrations under this section.

The department shall develop and maintain a list of oil spill primary response action contractors registered under this section. The department shall provide the list on request to interested persons.

A primary response action contractor registered under this section shall annually provide to the department a list of all contingency plans approved under AS

46.04.030

in which the primary response action contractor has agreed in writing to be listed as a responder.

Nothing in this section is intended to amend AS

46.04.030(l)

or to create a cleanup or performance standard that must be met by a holder of a contingency plan or a response action contractor.

In this section,

“oil” has the meaning given in AS

46.03.826

;

“primary response action contractor” means a person who enters into a response action contract with respect to a release or threatened release of oil and who is carrying out the contract, including a cooperative organization formed to maintain and supply response equipment and materials that enters into a response action contract relating to a release or threatened release of oil.

History.

(§ 13 ch 83 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For oil discharge prevention and contingency plans and nontank vessel plans, see 18 AAC 75, art. 4.

For oil spill primary response action contractors and nontank vessel cleanup contractors, incident management teams, and response planning facilitators, see 18 AAC 75, art. 5.

Sec. 46.04.040.
Proof of financial responsibility.

A person may not cause or permit the operation of an oil terminal facility in the state unless the person has furnished to the department, and the department has approved, proof of financial ability to respond in damages. Proof of financial responsibility required for a crude oil terminal is $50,000,000 per incident. Proof of financial responsibility required for a noncrude oil terminal is $25, per incident, for each barrel of total noncrude oil storage capacity at the terminal or $1,000,000, whichever is greater, subject to a maximum of $50,000,000. For purposes of this subsection, an oil terminal facility that stores both crude oil and noncrude oil is subject to the financial responsibility requirements applicable to the type of facility that corresponds to the type of oil storage that predominates at the facility. However, if the facility stores more noncrude oil than crude oil, the $25 per incident, per barrel requirement of this subsection applies to each barrel of oil storage capacity at the facility.

A person may not cause or permit the operation of a pipeline or an exploration or production facility in the state unless the person has furnished to the department, and the department has approved, proof of financial ability to respond in damages. Proof of financial responsibility required for

a pipeline or an offshore exploration or production facility is $50,000,000 per incident;

an onshore production facility is

$20,000,000 per incident if the facility produces over 10,000 barrels per day of oil;

$10,000,000 per incident if the facility produces over 5,000 barrels per day but not more than 10,000 barrels per day of oil;

$5,000,000 per incident if the facility produces over 2,500 barrels per day but not more than 5,000 barrels per day of oil;

$1,000,000 per incident if the facility produces 2,500 barrels per day or less of oil;

an onshore exploration facility is $1,000,000 per incident.

Except as provided in (m) of this section, a person may not operate a tank vessel or an oil barge within the waters of the state, or cause or permit the transfer of oil to or from a tank vessel or an oil barge, unless the person operating the tank vessel or oil barge has furnished to the department, and the department has approved, proof of financial ability to respond in damages. Proof of financial responsibility required under this subsection is

$300, per incident, for each barrel of storage capacity or $100,000,000, whichever is greater, for a tank vessel or barge carrying crude oil;

$100, per incident, for each barrel of storage capacity or $1,000,000, whichever is greater, subject to a maximum of $35,000,000, for a tank vessel or barge carrying noncrude oil.

Except as provided in (k) of this section, it is not a defense to an action brought for violation of (a) — (c) of this section that the person charged believed in good faith that proof of financial ability to respond in damages had been furnished to, and approved by, the department.

Financial responsibility may be demonstrated by (1) self-insurance, (2) insurance, (3) surety, (4) guarantee, (5) letter of credit approved by the department, or (6) other proof of financial responsibility approved by the department, including proof of financial responsibility provided by a group of insureds who have agreed to cover pollution risks of members of the group under terms the department may prescribe. An action brought under AS

46.03.758

,

46.03.759

,

46.03.760(a)

or (d),

46.03.822

, or AS

46.04.030(g)

may be brought in a state court directly against the insurer, the group, or another person providing evidence of financial responsibility; however, the liability under this section of a third-party insurer is limited to the type of risk assumed and the amount of coverage specified in the proof of financial responsibility furnished to and approved by the department. The applicant, and an insurer, surety, guarantor, person furnishing an approved letter of credit, or other group or person providing proof of financial responsibility approved by the department shall appoint an agent for service of process in the state. For purposes of this subsection, an insurer, other than a group of insureds whose agreement has been approved by the department, must either be authorized by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to sell insurance in the state or be an unauthorized insurer listed by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development as not disapproved for use in the state. In this subsection, “third-party insurer” means a third-party insurer, surety, guarantor, person furnishing a letter of credit, or other group or person providing proof of financial responsibility on behalf of an applicant under this section; “third-party insurer” does not include the applicant.

Acceptance of proof of financial responsibility expires

one year from its issuance for self-insurance;

on the effective date of a change in the surety bond, guarantee, insurance agreement, letter of credit, or other proof of financial responsibility; or

on the expiration or cancellation of the surety bond, guarantee, insurance agreement, letter of credit, or other proof of financial responsibility.

The person whose proof of financial responsibility is accepted by the department under this section shall notify the department at least 30 days before the effective date of a change, expiration or cancellation in the surety bond, guarantee, insurance agreement, letter of credit, or other proof of financial responsibility. Application for renewal of acceptance of proof of financial responsibility under this section must be filed at least 30 days before the date of expiration.

The department, after notice and hearing, may revoke acceptance of proof of financial responsibility if it determines that

acceptance was procured by fraud or misrepresentation; or

a change of circumstance has occurred other than a change specified in (f)(1) — (3) of this section, which would have warranted denial of the application.

Financial responsibility under this section extends to a loss compensable under AS

46.03.760(d)

or

46.03.822

and an assessment under AS

46.03.758

,

46.03.759

,

46.03.760(a)

, or AS

46.04.030(g)

.

Upon acceptance and approval of proof of financial responsibility under this section, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate stating that the state’s financial responsibility requirements have been satisfied. The certificate must include the name of the facility, pipeline, tank vessel, or oil barge for which it is issued and the expiration date of the certificate.

It is a defense to an action brought for violation of (a) — (c) of this section that the person charged relied on a certificate of approval issued under (j) of this section unless the person knew or had reason to know at the time of the alleged violation that the approval had been revoked or was expired.

Notwithstanding the requirements of (e) of this section, the applicant may provide evidence of financial responsibility provided by an insurer or other person who does not agree to be subject to direct action in state courts or to appoint an agent for service of process if

the department is satisfied that the insurance or other form of financial responsibility covers judgments under the statutes listed in (e) of this section;

the applicant provides proof of $50,000,000, or the amount required by (a) — (c) of this section, whichever is less, in insurance or other form of financial responsibility that meets the requirements of (e) of this section; and

the applicant provides a sworn statement or affidavit that insurance or other form of financial responsibility that meets the requirements of (e) of this section is not available in greater amounts.

A tank vessel or oil barge that is conducting, or is available only for conducting, oil discharge response operations is exempt from the requirements of (c) of this section if the tank vessel or oil barge has received prior approval of the department. The department may approve an exemption under this subsection upon application and presentation of information required by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 116 SLA 1980; am §§ 117, 118 ch 59 SLA 1982; am §§ 7, 8 ch 41 SLA 1989; am §§ 11 — 18 ch 191 SLA 1990; am § 60 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1994; am § 9 ch 140 SLA 1996; am § 8 ch 49 SLA 2002; am § 53 ch 49 SLA 2004; am § 3 ch 79 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under AS

46.04.045

, the dollar amounts in (a) and (c) of this section have been changed by regulation. In 1995, in (e) and (i) of this section “AS

46.03.760

(a) and (d)” was substituted for “AS

46.03.760

(a) and (e)” to reflect the 1995 reorganization of AS 46.03.760.

In 1999, in (e) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (e) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For civil penalties for discharges of oil, see AS

46.03.758

. For civil actions for pollution, see AS

46.03.760

; for provisions imposing strict liability for discharge of hazardous substances, see AS

46.03.822

; for revised dollar amounts, see 18 AAC 75.235.

Administrative Code. —

For financial responsibility for oil discharges, see 18 AAC 75, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Letters of undertaking are not adequate for proof of financial responsibility under this section. Aug. 28, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.